Wyoming, session 2025, HB0014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "(C)" means closure project;
(ii) "Maximum amount" means the total amount to
be expended on the listed project and reflects one hundred
percent (100%) of the project cost, including any award by
the state loan and investment board under W.S. 35-11-528;
(iii) "SWDD" means solid waste disposal
district;
(iv) "(T)" means transfer project.
(b) From amounts appropriated by 2013 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 194, Section 2(a) and (b), 2014 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 26, Section 333(a) and (b), 2015
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 142, Section 345 (priority
2), 2016 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 31, Section 316(a),
2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 134, Section 323(a), (c)
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0014
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and (d), as amended by 2019 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
80, Section 323, 2019 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 67,
Section 1, 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section
2, Section 020, footnote 2 and other funds appropriated and
authorized for program expenses, the following amounts and
prioritized projects are authorized pursuant to the
municipal solid waste facilities cease and transfer program
created by W.S. 35-11-528:
Priority Index Project Maximum Amount
1 Carcass management project $ 77,303
2 Newcastle, City of (T) $1,200,000
3 Moorcroft, Town of –
Moorcroft #3 (T) $1,500,000
4 Thermopolis, Town of (T) $2,000,000
5 Rawlins, City of (T) $ 780,000
6 Thermopolis, Town of (C) $2,500,000
7 Baggs SWDD (C) $2,250,000
8 Big Horn County SWDD –
North #2 (C) $2,800,000
9 Newcastle, City of (C) $3,700,000
10 Lincoln County –
Cokeville (C) $1,000,000
11 Uinta County Solid Waste –
Bridger Valley (C) $4,000,000
12 LaGrange, Town of (C) $1,400,000
13 Upton, Town of (C) $2,900,000
14 Park County Landfills –
TS Rolling Stock (T) $ 351,000
(c) Any municipal solid waste facility operator may
apply for the funds associated with the carcass management
project listed as priority 1 in subsection (b) of this
section. Funds for the carcass management project shall be
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0014
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
expended only for infrastructure necessary to haul, bury or
compost dead animals. Funds expended under this subsection
shall not exceed the amount listed in priority 1 in
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The department of environmental quality may
modify the authorized funds and the order of the projects
listed in the prioritized list contained in subsection (b)
of this section for any of the following reasons:
(i) To optimize efficiency;
(ii) Based on project readiness;
(iii) Based on compliance with grant or loan
qualifications or conditions;
(iv) To address emergency or immediate
environmental concerns.
(e) Not later than October 15 of each year, the
department of environmental quality shall report:
(i) Any modification of the prioritized list
contained in subsection (b) of this section to the joint
minerals, business and economic development interim
committee and the joint appropriations committee;
(ii) The names of recipients and amounts
expended for the carcass management project established by
priority 1 in subsections (b) and (c) of this section to
the joint minerals, business and economic development
interim committee.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0014
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 32 is
repealed.
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4